District of Columbia statutes.
24-408

Prisoners who may be paroled.

(a)

The power of the Board of Parole shall extend to all prisoners whose sentences exceed 180 days regardless of the nature of the offense; provided, that in the case of a prisoner convicted of an offense other than a felony, including violations of municipal regulations and ordinances and Acts of Congress in the nature of municipal regulations and ordinances, the prisoner may not be paroled until he has served one-third of the sentence imposed, and in the case of 2 or more sentences for other than a felony, no parole may be granted until after the prisoner has served one-third of the aggregate sentences imposed.

(a-1)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to any offense committed on or after August 5, 2000.

(b)

A person convicted of a crime of violence as defined by § 22-4501, shall not be paroled prior to serving 85% of the minimum sentence imposed; provided, that any mandatory minimum sentence shall be served in its entirety.

July 15, 1932, 47 Stat. 698, ch. 492, § 9
June 6, 1940, 54 Stat. 242, ch. 254, § 7(a)
July 17, 1947, 61 Stat. 379, ch. 263, § 6
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 801, 41 DCR 2608
June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-302, § 8(c), 47 DCR 7249

History

This section is referenced in § 24-463.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 24-208.
1973 Ed., § 24-208.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-302 added subsec. (a-1).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary amendment of section, see § 801 of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 8(c) of the Sentencing Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-410, August 11, 2000, 47 DCR 7271).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 8(c) of the Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 13-462, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 8(c) of Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-2, February 2, 2001, 48 DCR 2239).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 8(c) of Sentencing Reform Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-51, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4370).

Emergency Legislation